Washington statutes.
RCW 3.74.010

District judges to be members of state retirement system.

All district judges under chapters 3.30 through 3.74 RCW shall remain members of the state retirement system.

[ 1984 c 258 s 54; 1961 c 299 s 130.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.